Massachusetts, session 194th, S1704.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 147 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the following sections:
Section XX. Local and state police officers shall be equipped with a flotation device in
their on duty vehicles. Said flotation device shall be large enough and suitable for use in a water
rescue. These officials shall further receive water rescue training, including, but not limited to,
instruction on how to safely and properly use flotation devices in the event of a rescue.
Section XX. The municipal police training committee may promulgate regulations for
purposes of implementing this Act.
of 1